Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1607.02
Life insurance; employees, defined.

The term employees, as used in section 44-1607.01, may include the individual proprietors, partners, or members, if the employer is an individual proprietor, partnership, or limited liability company, and the directors of a corporate employer, if each individual proprietor, partner, member, or director devotes a substantial part of his or her time to the business of the proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company, or corporate employer.

Laws 1955, c. 181, § 2, p. 511;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 236.